Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.070

Jurisdiction—Extreme risk protection orders.

The superior courts have jurisdiction over extreme risk protection order proceedings under this chapter. The juvenile court may hear an extreme risk protection order proceeding under this chapter if the respondent is under the age of 18 years. Additionally, district courts have limited jurisdiction over the issuance and enforcement of temporary extreme risk protection orders issued under RCW 7.105.330. The district court shall set the full hearing in superior court and transfer the case. If the notice and order are not served on the respondent in time for the full hearing, the issuing court has concurrent jurisdiction with the superior court to extend the temporary extreme risk protection order. The superior court to which the case is being transferred shall determine whether to grant any request for a continuance.

[ 2022 c 268 s 3; 2021 c 215 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.